Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 10 Operators’ and Chauffeurs’ Licenses
31-10-19.
Driver education — Traffic safety education. [Contingent effective date; see note.]

The community college of Rhode Island shall provide thirty-three (33) hours of classroom instruction for applicants or prospective applicants, not more than twenty-one (21) years of age, for a limited-instruction permit or license. The instruction shall include eight (8) hours, specifically for instruction on the effects of alcohol and drugs on a driver, and the instruction shall be given by a person eligible for a teacher’s certificate issued under the authority of the state board of education and which course of instruction shall be approved by the state board of education. In case of emergency, the president of the community college of Rhode Island may declare, when no certified instructor is available to teach, that an individual eligible to teach at the community college of Rhode Island, who has taken the required course of instruction in driver education, may provide driver education instruction. All driver education programs shall include information concerning the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, chapter 18.6.1 of title 23, and information on donor cards pursuant to the applicable provisions of chapter 18.6.1 of title 23. The state board of education shall ensure that each person properly certified and approved to instruct driver education courses shall be given an equal opportunity for employment as an instructor within the driver education program. No person teaching driver education under this section shall own, be employed by, or be associated with a commercial driving school.

Driver education instruction shall be available to any eligible resident applicant not less than fifteen (15) years and ten (10) months of age.

That the state shall also provide a separate program of instruction, as previously set forth in this section, for special needs students whose individual education plan (IEP) indicates a need for a separate program of instruction.

The community college of Rhode Island shall provide a driver training program for physically handicapped drivers. The program shall instruct the physically handicapped driver in the operation of adapted vehicles for the handicapped. The adapted vehicles are to be provided by the handicapped individual. A physically handicapped person must be certified by a licensed physician that he or she is physically handicapped and possesses sufficient potential to become a competent motor vehicle operator. The community college of Rhode Island shall establish a tuition fee sufficient to cover the cost of the program.

A tuition or enrollment fee shall be required to be paid by an eligible applicant in accordance with rules and regulations of the state board of education; provided, that personal checks shall be an acceptable method of payment of the tuition or enrollment fee. The tuition or enrollment fee shall be deposited in a restricted receipt account established to pay any and all costs associated with the driver education program at the community college of Rhode Island and administered by the community college of Rhode Island.

The state board of education is authorized to establish administrative regulations to further implement this section.

The community college of Rhode Island shall establish tuition fees sufficient to cover the cost of the program and the administration of the driver education program. All positions established to implement the driver education program and funded in full by driver education program fees shall be exempt from the full-time equivalency cap established in Article 1 of the Appropriations Act, provided, however, that the board of governors shall report by June 1, 2004, the actual number of filled positions funded exclusively by driver education fees to the chairperson of the house finance committee, the chairperson of the senate finance committee, and the state budget officer.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the state board of education shall provide for a required course of instruction for the applicant’s parent, guardian, or designee where applicable, on the content of the driver education curriculum and the requirements for the graduated licensing for persons under the age of eighteen (18) as contained in §

31-10-6

. The course of instruction shall be made available in a classroom setting at numerous locations, days, and times throughout the state, approved by the community college of Rhode Island. All costs and expenses associated with the course of instruction, including, but not limited to, materials, instructors, and location fees shall be at the sole expense of the program providers. Once approved by the state board of education, an online course of instruction shall be made available to parent(s), guardian(s), or designee(s), where applicable, to meet the requirements of this section. Under no circumstances shall any parent, guardian, or designee, where applicable, be required to pay any cost or fee in association with participation in the course required by this section. Upon completion of the course pursuant to this section, no parent, guardian, or designee shall be required to take the course more than one time in a five-year (5) period. Parents, guardians, and designees with multiple children having completed this course shall be deemed to have satisfied this requirement for each child in their care applying for his or her license during the five-year (5) period. Should AAA or any other provider cease to provide the course and no other provider exists, the community college of Rhode Island shall not be required to provide the course of instruction nor shall it be required to pay any of the costs associated therewith. Parents, guardians, and designees shall not be required to complete the course prior to their child obtaining a license during any time at which a qualified program under this section does not exist. The community college of Rhode Island shall be responsible to develop the course of instruction and content for the parent instruction, or may approve a similar course of instruction, such as AAA’s course, as equivalent to it, and shall promulgate regulations and establish the appropriate method of providing the instruction. Should a qualified program cease to exist for a period of time greater than six (6) months, the course of instruction will not be required.

Dangers of distracted driving, including, but not limited to, use of cell phones would be included in this section curriculum and included in all testing as part of the state’s driver’s license examination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 189, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-32

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-19

; P.L. 1970, ch. 111, § 8; P.L. 1971, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. XI, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 103; P.L. 1998, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 22.

31-10-20.
Driver education course requirement before licensing.

No limited-instruction permit or license shall be issued to any person not more than eighteen (18) years of age unless that person shall have successfully completed a course of instruction as provided in §

31-10-19

, or a similar course of instruction recognized by the state board of education as equivalent to it. However, any person who is over eighteen (18) years of age and has been a holder of a motor vehicle operator’s license issued to that person by any other state, territory, or possession of the United States, or any other sovereignty for a period of one year immediately prior to his or her application for a license under this chapter shall not be required to comply with the provisions of this section.

Commencing on July 1, 2004, no limited-instruction permit or license shall be issued to any person not more than eighteen (18) years of age unless that person shall have successfully completed a course of instruction as provided in §

31-10-19

, or a similar course of instruction in another state recognized by the state board of education as equivalent to it. In determining whether a course is equivalent, the state board of education shall at a minimum require: (1) That the course consist of at least thirty-three (33) instructional hours that substantially conform with the current curriculum utilized by the instructor(s) at the Community College of Rhode Island, including a minimum of three (3) hours of instruction focusing upon specific Rhode Island traffic laws, the specific requirements of the Rhode Island graduated-licensing statute in §

31-10-6

, and eight (8) hours specifically for instruction on the effects of alcohol and drugs on a driver. All driver’s education programs shall include information concerning the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, chapter 18.6.1 of title 23, and information on donor cards pursuant to the applicable provisions of chapter 18.6.1 of title 23; (2) That the instructor holds a valid teacher’s certificate; (3) That the instructor satisfactorily completes at least a three-credit (3) course in traffic safety education at an accredited institution of higher education; and (4) That the program does not offer outside the classroom road test instruction or driving lessons to Rhode Island students. However, any person who is over eighteen (18) years of age and has been a holder of a motor vehicle operator’s license issued to that person by any other state, territory, or possession of the United States, or any other sovereignty for a period of one year immediately prior to his or her application for a license under this chapter shall not be required to comply with the provisions of this section.

The driver’s education course and driver’s license examination shall include material pertaining to a driver’s rights and responsibilities when stopped by a law enforcement officer as explained during the driver education course, including, but not limited to, rights provided to drivers pursuant to chapter 21.2 of title 31, the “comprehensive community-police relationship act of 2015.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 189, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-20

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 329, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 291, § 1.

31-10-21.
Written and eye examination.

Every applicant for a license to operate a motor vehicle upon the public highways shall be required by the division of motor vehicles to show, by examination or otherwise, the ability to read and understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic, the proper knowledge of the operation and mechanism of motor vehicles, the rules of the road, the motor vehicle law, and such other qualifications as will demonstrate that the applicant is a proper and safe person to operate a motor vehicle upon the public highways. The examination shall include a test of the applicant’s eyesight. Notwithstanding the foregoing,

Any person who has successfully completed a driver education course as set forth in §

31-10-19

and who has passed a standardized written driver’s license examination approved by the director of the department of revenue shall not be required to take the written examination. The director of the department of revenue shall develop a standardized written driver’s license examination which shall be administered by certified driver education instructors at the completion of each driver’s education course.

An applicant, within six (6) months of having been certified by the department of elementary and secondary education as having passed a written examination administered by that department, shall, upon completion of an eyesight test by the division of motor vehicles, be considered in compliance with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-18

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-21

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 454, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 9; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 9.

31-10-22.
Road test.

All applicants for a motor vehicle license shall pass a motor vehicle road test as prescribed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles in a motor vehicle supplied by the applicant or in a dual-controlled motor vehicle supplied by the state. In the case of the examination for a chauffeur to operate a truck, tractor, trailer, tractor semi-trailer, bus, or other vehicle for hire, or a person who will operate only a vehicle equipped with automatic shift, or a person who is disabled and requires the use of a specially equipped motor vehicle, the person shall be examined in a vehicle furnished by the person. At the option of any person who is disabled, the road test shall be administered by the local office of the division of motor vehicles nearest that person’s home. A fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) shall be charged for all road tests, including repeat road tests, following failure of a road test.

Any applicant for a motor vehicle license with limited English proficiency (LEP) may, during the road test, be accompanied by an interpreter, at the applicant’s own expense and choosing, who may translate the road test examiner’s directions to the applicant. The interpreter shall be eighteen (18) years of age or older. The applicant shall be responsible for and assume all liability for the presence of the interpreter in the motor vehicle. The division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-19

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-22

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 93, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 69; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 69; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 6; P.L. 2017, ch. 356, § 1.

31-10-23.
Examiners not liable for acts of persons being examined.

The investigators or examiners in the employ of the division of motor vehicles shall not be liable for the acts of any person who is being examined by the investigators or examiners.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-20

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-23

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-10-24.
Applicants excused from road test.

The provisions of §

31-10-22

shall not apply in the case of an applicant who already has been granted a valid operator’s license issued by a state or federal agency which has a reciprocal agreement with the state of Rhode Island in the matter of requirements for operator’s licenses. Also, §

31-10-22

shall not apply when an examiner of the division of motor vehicles is examining any student of a public or parochial educational institution which offers a course in driver training education acceptable to the division of motor vehicles, provided that the motor vehicle used by the educational institution for driver training education in which the student has received his or her driver training has been equipped with a dual control.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-21

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-24

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-10-25.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-22

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-25

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1998, ch. 89, § 2, effective July 3, 1998.

31-10-26.
Issuance of license.

The division of motor vehicles shall, upon payment of the required fee, issue to every qualifying applicant an operator’s or chauffeur’s license. The license shall be approximately two and one-half inches (21/2") wide and three and one-half inches (31/2") long and shall bear on it a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee; the full name; date of birth; residence address; brief description of the licensee; a photograph of the licensee; whether the licensee has indicated a desire to donate tissue or organs pursuant to the provisions of chapter 18.6.1 of title 23; and either a space upon which the licensee shall write his or her usual signature with pen and ink or a facsimile of the signature of the licensee. No license shall be valid until it has been so signed by the licensee designated on it. A negative file of all photographs of licensees shall be maintained by the division of motor vehicles for a period of five (5) years.

The division of motor vehicles shall issue an operator’s or chauffeur’s license pursuant to this chapter to every qualifying applicant, including, but not limited to, any current or past recipient of a grant of deferred action under the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) program, provided any applicant subject to the DACA program shall provide evidence of having received the grant from the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.

The division of motor vehicles shall issue special licenses to those licensees who have indicated that they desire to donate tissue or organs, which conform to the provisions of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, chapter 18.6.1 of title 23.

Any person who is a law enforcement officer, meaning any permanently employed member of the state, city, or town police departments, sheriffs and deputy sheriffs, members of the marshal’s unit, capitol police, and the state fire marshal and deputy fire marshals of the division of building, design and fire professionals or a member of the department of attorney general, any permanently employed federal law enforcement officer assigned in Rhode Island, or any member of the United States Attorney’s Office in Rhode Island or any employee of the R.I. department of corrections, as recommended by the director of the department of corrections, upon request of the applicant, shall be issued a license that contains the applicant’s official business address in lieu of a residence address as required under the general provisions of this section.

The license issued to a person applying for the first time shall be designated as a “first license.” A first license shall be issued for a one-year period after which time a permanent driver’s license shall be issued according to this section.

If an applicant has been adjudicated for committing one moving motor vehicle violation, has been involved in one reportable motor vehicle accident, or both, he or she shall be summoned for a hearing before a judge of the traffic tribunal at which time the driving record will be reviewed. The traffic tribunal judge shall determine if the person should be granted an operator’s license, be reissued a first license, or be denied a license to operate a motor vehicle in the state of Rhode Island.

Any person who is under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall, upon payment of the required fee and upon meeting the qualifications for the receipt of an operator’s or chauffeur’s license, be issued a license that shall be readily distinguishable in color from those licenses issued to persons who are twenty-one (21) years of age or older. When a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years to whom a license has been issued and whose license is in full force and effect, attains his or her twenty-first birthday, he or she shall be entitled to receive a new license of the type issued to persons who are older than the age of twenty-one (21) years from the administrator of the division of motor vehicles upon demand at no expense. Every person shall supply to the division of motor vehicles satisfactory proof of his or her date of birth.

The division of motor vehicles shall issue special licenses upon the request of a licensee that conform to the provisions of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, chapter 18.6.1 of title 23.

The division of motor vehicles shall note in an appropriate manner a restriction on any person’s license who is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system as provided in chapter 27 of this title.

Any personal digitized information contained within an operator’s or chauffeur’s license shall be limited to: (a) the licensee’s name, age, date of birth, address, gender, physical description such as weight, height, hair color and eye color, signature and organ donor status; and (b) the license number, commercial endorsements, expiration date, issue date, restriction, and class.

Except to the extent an entity is authorized to renew drivers’ licenses, or except for financial institutions engaged in the verification of information for financial transactions, nongovernmental entities shall not have access to any digitized information contained in an operator’s or chauffeur’s license other than the licensee’s name, age, date of birth, signature, and photographic image, and the license’s expiration date; nor shall they store, record, or retain any such information obtained through a digital reading device. Access to digitized information by these entities shall be solely for the purpose of determining the age of an individual for a transaction, right, or privilege available by law only to persons of a certain age.

To the extent that nongovernmental entities shall have access to the digitized information stored on an operator’s or chauffeur’s license, the entity shall be civilly liable for the unauthorized access to, or retention or use of, the information by its agents or persons acting in the name of the entity.

The division of motor vehicles shall collect from applicants and licensees their social security numbers and tax identification numbers only to the extent required by federal law. The numbers shall not be included, either digitally or visually, on the operator’s or chauffeur’s license.

Issuance of a Rhode Island operator’s license under this chapter to a current or past recipient of a grant of deferred action under the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) program shall not confer the right to vote in the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-23

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-26

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 57, § 2; P.L. 1978, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 354, § 6; P.L. 1992, ch. 405, § 4; P.L. 1992, ch. 465, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 28, § 8; P.L. 1997, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 462, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 36, § 1.

31-10-26.1.
Anatomical gifts by drivers.

The division of motor vehicles shall cause to be sent to each person applying for or renewing a license, as provided for in §

31-10-26

, a document containing a summary description and explanation of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, chapter 18.6.1 of title 23.

The division of motor vehicles may, on behalf of the state accept and deposit with the general treasurer any grant, gift, or contribution made to assist in meeting the cost of carrying out the purposes of this section and to expend the grant, gift, or contribution for those purposes.

The division of motor vehicles may make and sign any agreements and may do and perform any and all acts which may be necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this section.

The division of motor vehicles shall issue special licenses upon request of a licensee which conform to the provisions of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, chapter 18.6.1 of title 23.

Neither the administrator of the division of motor vehicles nor any employee of the state shall be liable in any suit for damages as a result of his or her acts or omissions or for any action under the provisions of this section.

The division of motor vehicles shall cause to be posted in all of its customer service locations a sign or other material encouraging persons to make anatomical gifts during the process of issuing and renewing licenses provided for in §

31-10.1-1

and in accordance with the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, chapter 18.6.1 of title 23.

The division of motor vehicles shall cause to be produced application forms and renewal forms for driver’s licenses and nonoperator identification cards that clearly offer Rhode Island residents the option to consent to organ and tissue donation in accordance with §

31-10.1-8

. Only a “yes” or affirmative response will be noted. Information held by the division of motor vehicles regarding a person’s consent to donate shall constitute the “Rhode Island Donor Registry.” This information will be made available to all federally designated organ procurement organizations and law enforcement organizations twenty-four (24) hours a day via a password protected Internet connection and will only be used to facilitate anatomical gifts in accordance with the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, chapter 23-18.6.1.

The division of motor vehicles shall develop by January 1, 2008 a method that requires written consent and confirmation to allow residents of Rhode Island to have their names accurately added to or deleted from the division’s Rhode Island Donor Registry in the periods between mandated driver’s license renewals. Persons added to the Donor Registry in this manner shall be considered as having made a document of gift.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 286, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 62; P.L. 2003, ch. 392, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 476, § 3.

31-10-27.
License to be carried and exhibited on demand.

Every licensee shall have his or her operator’s or chauffeur’s license in his or her immediate possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle and shall display the license upon the demand of any peace office or inspector of the division of motor vehicles and shall, upon request by any proper officer, write his or her name in the presence of that officer for the purpose of being identified. However, no person charged with violating this section shall be convicted if he or she produces in court or the office of the arresting officer an operator’s or chauffeur’s license previously issued to him or her and valid at the time of his or her arrest.

Every school bus operator shall display in a prominent place in the bus he or she is operating both a valid chauffeur’s license or a reasonable facsimile of it, and a valid school bus driver’s certificate, both of which have been issued by this state under the provisions of this title. A display case shall be provided to display these documents by the registered owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-25

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-27

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 62.

31-10-28.
Restricted licenses.

The division of motor vehicles, upon issuing an operator’s or chauffeur’s license, shall have the authority whenever good cause appears to impose restrictions suitable to the licensee’s driving ability with respect to the type of, or special mechanical control devices required on a motor vehicle which the licensee may operate or the other restrictions applicable to the licensee as the division of motor vehicles may determine to be appropriate to assure the safe operation of a motor vehicle by the licensee.

The division of motor vehicles may either issue a special restricted license or may set forth such restrictions upon the usual license form. In the case of an individual who, because of any visual disability, is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle in darkness, the division of motor vehicles, upon receipt of an affidavit from a licensed physician or ophthalmologist certifying that the individual is capable of operating a motor vehicle during the daylight hours, may issue a special restricted license permitting the individual to operate a motor vehicle only during the daylight hours.

The division of motor vehicles may upon receiving satisfactory evidence of any violation of the restrictions of a restricted license suspend or revoke the license but the licensee shall be entitled to a hearing as upon a suspension or revocation under chapter 2 of this title.

It is a civil violation for any person to operate a motor vehicle in any manner in violation of the restrictions imposed in a restricted license issued to that person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-24

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-28

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 4.

31-10-29.
Duplicate certificates.

In the event that an instruction permit or operator’s or chauffeur’s license issued under the provisions of this chapter is lost or destroyed, the person to whom the permit or license was issued may apply for the permit or license, and upon payment of the required fee of ten dollars ($10.00) obtain a duplicate certificate. The applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the division of motor vehicles that the permit or license has been lost or destroyed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-29

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 10, art. 1, § 3.

31-10-30.
Expiration and renewal of licenses.

Every operator’s and chauffeur’s first license to operate a motor vehicle shall be by the issuance of a temporary license for the period beginning at the date of issuance and expiring on the birthday of the licensee in the second year following the issuance of the temporary license. Every operator’s and chauffeur’s license issued after expiration of the temporary license shall expire on the birthday of the licensee in the fifth year following the issuance of the license, with the exception of any person seventy-five (75) years of age or older whose license shall expire on the birthday of the licensee in the second year following the issuance of the license, and shall be renewable on or before expiration upon application and payment of the fee required by this chapter. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles, having good cause to believe the applicant for renewal is incompetent or otherwise not qualified, may require an examination of the applicant as upon an original application; provided, however, if the renewal applicant is applying for a commercial driver’s license and is in possession of a valid medical examination certificate issued pursuant to federal motor carrier safety regulations 49 CFR 391.41-391.49 that applicant shall be deemed to be competent and qualified under this chapter. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized to adopt any regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 16; P.L. 1954, ch. 3337, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-30

; P.L. 1960, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 439, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 106; P.L. 2008, ch. 159, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 93, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 116, § 1.

31-10-31.
Fees.

The following fees shall be paid to the division of motor vehicles:

For every operator’s first license to operate a motor vehicle, twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

For every chauffeur’s first license, twenty-five dollars ($25.00); provided, that when a Rhode Island licensed operator transfers to a chauffeur’s license, the fee for the transfer shall be two dollars ($2.00);

For every learner’s permit to operate a motorcycle, twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

For every operator’s first license to operate a motorcycle, twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

For every renewal of an operator’s or chauffeur’s license, thirty dollars ($30.00); with the exception of any person seventy-five (75) years of age or older for whom the renewal fee will be eight dollars ($8.00);

For every duplicate operator’s or chauffeur’s license and every routine information update, i.e., name change or address change, twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

For every certified copy of any license, permit, or application issued under this chapter, ten dollars ($10.00);

For every duplicate instruction permit, ten dollars ($10.00);

For every first license examination, five dollars ($5.00);

For surrender of an out-of-state license, in addition to the above fees, five dollars ($5.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 10; P.L. 1954, ch. 3337, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-31

; P.L. 1960, ch. 63, § 2; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 10, art. 1, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 24, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 159, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 6; P.L. 2012, ch. 164, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 249, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 8, § 2.

31-10-32.
Notice of change of address or name.

Whenever any person after applying for or receiving an operator’s or chauffeur’s license shall move from the address named in his or her application or in the license issued to him or her, or when the name of a licensee is changed by marriage or otherwise, that person shall within ten (10) days thereafter notify the division of motor vehicles in writing of his or her old and new addresses or of his or her former and new names and of the number of any license then held by him or her. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-28

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-32

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 106.

31-10-33.
Records to be kept by the division of motor vehicles.

The division of motor vehicles shall file every application for a license received by it and shall maintain suitable indexes containing, in alphabetical order:

All applications denied and on each application shall note the reasons for the denial;

All applications granted; and

The name of every licensee whose license has been suspended or revoked and after each name shall note the reasons for the action.

The division of motor vehicles shall also file all accident reports and abstracts of court records of convictions received by it under the laws of this state. The division shall maintain convenient records or make suitable notations in order that an individual record of each licensee showing the convictions of that licensee and the traffic accidents in which the licensee has been involved shall be readily ascertainable and available for the consideration of the division of motor vehicles upon any application for a renewal of license and at other suitable times.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 18; G.L. 1956, §§

31-10-26

,

31-10-27

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-33

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-10-34 — 31-10-34.4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, chs. 218, 254, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 415, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 105, § 4; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 66; Repealed by P.L. 2005, ch. 20, § 9, and by P.L. 2005, ch. 27, § 9, effective May 5, 2005.

31-10-34.5.
Transfer of functions to administrator of division of motor vehicles.

On May 4, 2005 all functions, services performed, responsibilities and duties formerly of the drivers’ training school licensing board are hereby transferred to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 20, § 10; P.L. 2005, ch. 27, § 10; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 28.

31-10-35.
Commercial drivers’ school license required.

No person, unless licensed under the provisions of this chapter, shall engage in the business of giving instruction for compensation in the driving of motor vehicles and motorcycles. However, no license shall be required of a person who is engaged in teaching in a regularly recognized secondary school or college driver training program or a program in §

31-10.1-1.2

, which is approved by the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 224, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 62; P.L. 2008, ch. 96, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 147, § 3.

31-10-36.
Application for commercial drivers’ school license.

An application for a commercial drivers’ school license shall be made upon the form prescribed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles and shall contain the name and address of the applicant, the location or locations of the proposed school, and any other pertinent information as may be required by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles to safeguard the public interest. Every application shall be accompanied by the fee required by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 224, § 2.

31-10-37.
Fee — Expiration of license — Duplicates.

The fee for each application for a commercial drivers’ school license shall be fifty dollars ($50.00). The license shall be granted or denied by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles within thirty (30) days after the application has been filed. The license shall expire, unless sooner revoked or suspended, on the 30th day of June following its effective date. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue a separate license certificate for each location designated by the applicant and the certificate shall be displayed at that location. In case of the loss, mutilation, or destruction of a certificate, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue a duplicate of it upon proof of the facts and payment of a fee of one dollar ($1.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 224, § 2.